Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 13 COLORADO PRIVACY ACT
6-1-1308. Duties of controllers.

[Editor's note: This section is effective July 1, 2023.]

Duty of transparency. (a) A controller shall provide consumers with a reasonably accessible, clear, and meaningful privacy notice that includes:

The categories of personal data collected or processed by the controller or a processor;

The purposes for which the categories of personal data are processed;

How and where consumers may exercise the rights pursuant to section 6-1-1306, including the controller's contact information and how a consumer may appeal a controller's action with regard to the consumer's request;

The categories of personal data that the controller shares with third parties, if any; and

The categories of third parties, if any, with whom the controller shares personal data.

(b) If a controller sells personal data to third parties or processes personal data for targeted advertising, the controller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the sale or processing, as well as the manner in which a consumer may exercise the right to opt out of the sale or processing.

(c) A controller shall not:

(I) Require a consumer to create a new account in order to exercise a right; or

(II) Based solely on the exercise of a right and unrelated to feasibility or the value of a service, increase the cost of, or decrease the availability of, the product or service.

(d) Nothing in this part 13 shall be construed to require a controller to provide a product or service that requires the personal data of a consumer that the controller does not collect or maintain or to prohibit a controller from offering a different price, rate, level, quality, or selection of goods or services to a consumer, including offering goods or services for no fee, if the offer is related to a consumer's voluntary participation in a bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium features, discount, or club card program.

Duty of purpose specification. A controller shall specify the express purposes for which personal data are collected and processed.

Duty of data minimization. A controller's collection of personal data must be adequate, relevant, and limited to what is reasonably necessary in relation to the specified purposes for which the data are processed.

Duty to avoid secondary use. A controller shall not process personal data for purposes that are not reasonably necessary to or compatible with the specified purposes for which the personal data are processed, unless the controller first obtains the consumer's consent.

Duty of care. A controller shall take reasonable measures to secure personal data during both storage and use from unauthorized acquisition. The data security practices must be appropriate to the volume, scope, and nature of the personal data processed and the nature of the business.

Duty to avoid unlawful discrimination. A controller shall not process personal data in violation of state or federal laws that prohibit unlawful discrimination against consumers.

Duty regarding sensitive data. A controller shall not process a consumer's sensitive data without first obtaining the consumer's consent or, in the case of the processing of personal data concerning a known child, without first obtaining consent from the child's parent or lawful guardian.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-190), ch. 483, p. 3460, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

6-1-1309. Data protection assessments - attorney general access and evaluation - definition.

[Editor's note: This section is effective July 1, 2023.]

A controller shall not conduct processing that presents a heightened risk of harm to a consumer without conducting and documenting a data protection assessment of each of its processing activities that involve personal data acquired on or after July 1, 2023, that present a heightened risk of harm to a consumer.

For purposes of this section, "processing that presents a heightened risk of harm to a consumer" includes the following:

Processing personal data for purposes of targeted advertising or for profiling if the profiling presents a reasonably foreseeable risk of:

Unfair or deceptive treatment of, or unlawful disparate impact on, consumers;

Financial or physical injury to consumers;

A physical or other intrusion upon the solitude or seclusion, or the private affairs or concerns, of consumers if the intrusion would be offensive to a reasonable person; or

Other substantial injury to consumers;

Selling personal data; and

Processing sensitive data.

Data protection assessments must identify and weigh the benefits that may flow, directly and indirectly, from the processing to the controller, the consumer, other stakeholders, and the public against the potential risks to the rights of the consumer associated with the processing, as mitigated by safeguards that the controller can employ to reduce the risks. The controller shall factor into this assessment the use of de-identified data and the reasonable expectations of consumers, as well as the context of the processing and the relationship between the controller and the consumer whose personal data will be processed.

A controller shall make the data protection assessment available to the attorney general upon request. The attorney general may evaluate the data protection assessment for compliance with the duties contained in section 6-1-1308 and with other laws, including this article 1. Data protection assessments are confidential and exempt from public inspection and copying under the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24. The disclosure of a data protection assessment pursuant to a request from the attorney general under this subsection (4) does not constitute a waiver of any attorney-client privilege or work-product protection that might otherwise exist with respect to the assessment and any information contained in the assessment.

A single data protection assessment may address a comparable set of processing operations that include similar activities.

Data protection assessment requirements apply to processing activities created or generated after July 1, 2023, and are not retroactive.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-190), ch. 483, p. 3462, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

6-1-1310. Liability.

[Editor's note: This section is effective July 1, 2023.]

Notwithstanding any provision in part 1 of this article 1, this part 13 does not authorize a private right of action for a violation of this part 13 or any other provision of law. This subsection (1) neither relieves any party from any duties or obligations imposed, nor alters any independent rights that consumers have, under other laws, including this article 1, the state constitution, or the United States constitution.

Where more than one controller or processor, or both a controller and a processor, involved in the same processing violates this part 13, the liability shall be allocated among the parties according to principles of comparative fault.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-190), ch. 483, p. 3463, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

6-1-1311. Enforcement - penalties - repeal.

[Editor's note: This section is effective July 1, 2023.]

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article 1, the attorney general and district attorneys have exclusive authority to enforce this part 13 by bringing an action in the name of the state or as parens patriae on behalf of persons residing in the state to enforce this part 13 as provided in this article 1, including seeking an injunction to enjoin a violation of this part 13.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article 1, nothing in this part 13 shall be construed as providing the basis for, or being subject to, a private right of action for violations of this part 13 or any other law.

For purposes only of enforcement of this part 13 by the attorney general or a district attorney, a violation of this part 13 is a deceptive trade practice.

Prior to any enforcement action pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, the attorney general or district attorney must issue a notice of violation to the controller if a cure is deemed possible. If the controller fails to cure the violation within sixty days after receipt of the notice of violation, an action may be brought pursuant to this section. This subsection (1)(d) is repealed, effective January 1, 2025.

The state treasurer shall credit all receipts from the imposition of civil penalties under this part 13 pursuant to section 24-31-108.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-190), ch. 483, p. 3463, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

6-1-1312. Preemption - local governments.

[

Editor's note: This section is effective July 1, 2023.

]

This part 13 supersedes and preempts laws, ordinances, resolutions, regulations, or the equivalent adopted by any statutory or home rule municipality, county, or city and county regarding the processing of personal data by controllers or processors.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-190), ch. 483, p. 3464, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

6-1-1313. Rules - opt-out mechanism.

[Editor's note: This section is effective July 1, 2023.]

The attorney general may promulgate rules for the purpose of carrying out this part 13.

By July 1, 2023, the attorney general shall adopt rules that detail the technical specifications for one or more universal opt-out mechanisms that clearly communicate a consumer's affirmative, freely given, and unambiguous choice to opt out of the processing of personal data for purposes of targeted advertising or the sale of personal data pursuant to section 6-1-1306 (1)(a)(I)(A) or (1)(a)(I)(B). The attorney general may update the rules that detail the technical specifications for the mechanisms from time to time to reflect the means by which consumers interact with controllers. The rules must:

Not permit the manufacturer of a platform, browser, device, or any other product offering a universal opt-out mechanism to unfairly disadvantage another controller;

Require controllers to inform consumers about the opt-out choices available under section 6-1-1306 (1)(a)(I);

Not adopt a mechanism that is a default setting, but rather clearly represents the consumer's affirmative, freely given, and unambiguous choice to opt out of the processing of personal data pursuant to section 6-1-1306 (1)(a)(I)(A) or (1)(a)(I)(B);

Adopt a mechanism that is consumer-friendly, clearly described, and easy to use by the average consumer;

Adopt a mechanism that is as consistent as possible with any other similar mechanism required by law or regulation in the United States; and

Permit the controller to accurately authenticate the consumer as a resident of this state and determine that the mechanism represents a legitimate request to opt out of the processing of personal data for purposes of targeted advertising or the sale of personal data pursuant to section 6-1-1306 (1)(a)(I)(A) or (1)(a)(I)(B).

By January 1, 2025, the attorney general may adopt rules that govern the process of issuing opinion letters and interpretive guidance to develop an operational framework for business that includes a good faith reliance defense of an action that may otherwise constitute a violation of this part 13. The rules must become effective by July 1, 2025.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-190), ch. 483 p. 3464, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.